Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2521.05
Aggravating circumstances; interlocutory appeal prohibited.

The verdict of a jury as to the existence or nonexistence of the alleged aggravating circumstances or, when the right to a jury determination of the alleged aggravating circumstances has been waived, the determination of a panel of judges with respect thereto, shall not be an appealable order or judgment of the district court, and no appeal may be taken directly from such verdict or determination.

Laws 2002, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 13;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 29-2521.05 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.